Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.405.120

Training for evaluators.

(1) School districts shall require each administrator, each principal, or other supervisory personnel who has responsibility for evaluating classroom teachers or principals to have training in evaluation procedures.

(2) Before school district implementation of the revised evaluation systems required under RCW 28A.405.100, principals and administrators who have evaluation responsibilities must engage in professional development designed to implement the revised systems and maximize rater agreement. The professional development to support the revised evaluation systems must also include foundational elements of cultural competence, focusing on multicultural education and principles of English language acquisition.

[ 2016 c 72 s 203; 2012 c 35 s 2; 1995 c 335 s 401; 1985 c 420 s 3. Formerly RCW 28A.67.210.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2016 c 72: See note following RCW 28A.600.015.

Part headings, table of contents not law—1995 c 335: See note following RCW 28A.150.360.

Contingency—Effective date—Severability—1985 c 420: See notes following RCW 28A.405.110.